Indiana, session 2026, SB90.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-1-9-4.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.2. (a) A practitioner, a student in training in a
medical school, an intern, a resident, a graduate student, or an
individual participating in a clinical training or resident program
may not perform a pelvic, prostate, or rectal examination on a
sedated, anesthetized, or unconscious patient unless one (1) of the
following conditions is met:
(1) The patient, patient's guardian, or patient's health care
representative (as defined in IC 16-21-12-4) provides prior
written informed consent to the pelvic, prostate, or rectal
examination through the notice described in subsection (b).
(2) The performance of a pelvic, prostate, or rectal
examination is within the scope of care ordered for the
surgical procedure or diagnostic examination to be performed
on the patient and the patient, patient's guardian, or patient's
health care representative has given informed consent.
(3) A medical emergency exists and the pelvic, prostate, or
rectal examination is immediately necessary for diagnostic
examination or treatment of the patient, including the
conducting of a rape kit.
SEA 90 — Concur

2
(4) A court has ordered the performance of the pelvic,
prostate, or rectal examination for the purposes of the
collection of evidence.
(b) A written informed consent described in subsection (a)(1)
must meet the following:
(1) Be separate from any other notice or agreement. However,
the informed consent does not have to be separate if the
pelvic, prostate, or rectal examination is within the scope of
care for the surgical procedure or diagnostic examination to
be performed on the patient.
(2) Specify the nature and purpose of the examination.
(3) Include a description of the procedure to be performed.
(4) State the name of the individual performing or supervising
the examination.
(5) Disclose whether a student will be performing or
observing the examination.
(6) Allow the patient, patient's guardian, or patient's health
care representative to decline the examination.
(7) Allow the patient, patient's guardian, or patient's health
care representative to decline allowing a student to perform
or observe the examination.
(8) Include a signature line for the patient, patient's guardian,
or patient's health care representative to consent or refuse to
consent to an examination on a sedated, anesthetized, or
unconscious patient as described in subsection (a).
The signature of consent must be obtained in order to proceed with
the pelvic, prostate, or rectal examination on a sedated,
anesthetized, or unconscious patient as described in subsection
(a)(1).
(c) The refusal by the patient, patient's guardian, or patient's
health care representative to consent to an examination described
in subsection (a)(1) may not affect the medical procedure for which
the patient is scheduled to receive.
(d) Nothing in this section diminishes any other statutory
requirement for a practitioner, a student in training in a medical
school, an intern, a resident, a graduate student, or an individual
participating in a clinical training or resident program to obtain
informed consent.
SEA 90 — Concur

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 90 — Concur